Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.095

Exemption from reserve fund—Motor vehicle fund income from United States securities.

Whenever moneys of the motor vehicle fund shall be invested in bonds, notes, bills or certificates of the United States treasury payable at par upon demand, or within a term not greater than one year, it shall not be necessary to place any portion of the income therefrom in the reserve fund provided for in *RCW 43.84.090.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.84.095. Prior: 1953 c 56 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.84.090 was repealed by 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 122, effective July 1, 1991.